dev/verbs/tgl.lexc
LEXICON RegSuffixes

! Pure infinitive
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf:				#;

!-------------!
! Infinitives !
!-------------!
! Obj trigger I
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Obj1:%>in	#; 

! Obj Trigger II
@R.PREF.i@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Obj2:		#;

! Obj Trigger III
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Obj3:%>an	#; 

! Actor Trigger I
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@R.INFX.um@+V+Inf+Act1:		#;

! Actor Trigger II 
@R.PREF.mag@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Act2:		#;

! Actor Trigger III
@R.PREF.ma@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Act3:		#;

! Actor Trigger IV
@R.PREF.mang@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Act4:		#;

! Locative Trigger
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Loc:%>an		#;

! Benefactive Trigger
@R.PREF.i@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Ben:			#;

! Instrument Trigger
@R.PREF.ipaN@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Ins:			#;

! Reason Trigger
@R.PREF.ika@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Inf+Rea:			#;

!---------------!
! Contemplative !
!---------------!
! Obj trigger I
@D.PREF@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Obj1:%>in	#;  

! Obj Trigger II
@R.PREF.i@@R.CV.PREF@+V+Cont+Obj2:		#;

! Obj Trigger III
@R.CV.PREF@@D.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Obj3:%>an	#; 

! Actor Trigger I
@R.CV.PREF@@D.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Act1:		#;

! Actor Trigger II 
@R.PREF.mag@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Act2:		#;

! Actor Trigger III
@R.PREF.ma@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Act3:		#;

! Actor Trigger IV
@R.PREF.mang@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Act4:		#;

! Locative Trigger
@D.PREF@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Loc:%>an		#;

! Benefactive Trigger
@R.PREF.i@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Ben:			#;

! Instrument Trigger
! TODO
@R.PREF.ipaN@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Ins:			#;

!TODO
! Reason Trigger
@R.PREF.ika@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Cont+Rea:			#;

!-------------!
! Progressive !
!-------------!
! Obj trigger I
@D.PREF@@R.CV.INFX@@R.INFX.in@+V+Prog+Obj1:		#;  

! Obj Trigger II
@R.PREF.i@@R.CV.INFX@@R.INFX.in@+V+Prog+Obj2:		#;

! Obj Trigger III
@D.PREF@@R.CV.INFX@@R.INFX.in@+V+Prog+Obj3:%>an	#; 

! Actor Trigger I
@D.PREF@@R.CV.INFX@@R.INFX.um@+V+Prog+Act1:		#;

! Actor Trigger II 
@R.PREF.nag@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Prog+Act2:		#;

! Actor Trigger III
@R.PREF.na@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Prog+Act3:		#;

! Actor Trigger IV
@R.PREF.nang@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Prog+Act4:		#;

! Locative Trigger
@D.PREF@@R.CV.INFX@@R.INFX.in@+V+Prog+Loc:%>an		#;

! Benefactive Trigger
@R.PREF.i@@R.CV.INFX@@R.INFX.in@+V+Prog+Ben:			#;

! Instrument Trigger
@R.PREF.ipinaN@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Prog+Ins:			#;

! Reason Trigger
@R.PREF.ikina@@R.CV.PREF@@D.INFX@+V+Prog+Rea:			#;


!-------------!
! Completed   !
!-------------!
! Obj trigger I
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@R.INFX.in@+V+Comp+Obj1:		#;  

! Obj Trigger II
@R.PREF.i@@D.CV@@R.INFX.in@+V+Comp+Obj2:		#;

! Obj Trigger III
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@R.INFX.in@+V+Comp+Obj3:%>an	#; 

! Actor Trigger I
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@R.INFX.um@+V+Comp+Act1:		#;

! Actor Trigger II 
@R.PREF.nag@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Comp+Act2:		#;

! Actor Trigger III
@R.PREF.na@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Comp+Act3:		#;

! Actor Trigger IV
@R.PREF.nang@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Comp+Act4:		#;

! Locative Trigger
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@R.INFX.in@+V+Comp+Loc:%>an		#;

! Benefactive Trigger
@R.PREF.i@@D.CV@@R.INFX.in@+V+Comp+Ben:			#;

! Instrument Trigger
@R.PREF.ipinaN@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Comp+Ins:			#;

! Reason Trigger
@R.PREF.ikina@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Comp+Rea:			#;

!-------------!
! Imperative  !
!-------------!

! Obj trigger I
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Imp+Obj1:		#;
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Imp+Obj1:%>a		#;

! Obj Trigger II
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Imp+Obj2:%>an	#; 

! Obj Trigger III
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Imp+Obj3:%>i		#;

! Actor Trigger I
@D.PREF@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Imp+Act1:		#;

! Actor Trigger II 
@R.PREF.pag@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Imp+Act2:		#;

! Actor Trigger IV
@R.PREF.pang@@D.CV@@D.INFX@+V+Imp+Act4:		#;

END
